lv/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/lv_LV.aff
SFX C Y 14
SFX C t īšu   [^m]st  is:1vnt0
SFX C t īsi   [^m]st  is:2vnt0
SFX C t īs    [^m]st  is:3xnt0
SFX C t īsim  [^m]st  is:1dnt0
SFX C t īsiet [^m]st  is:2dnt0
SFX C t īsit  [^m]st  is:2dnt0
SFX C t īšot  [^m]st  is:0xnta
SFX C st tīšu   [m]st  is:1vnt0
SFX C st tīsi   [m]st  is:2vnt0
SFX C st tīs    [m]st  is:3xnt0
SFX C st tīsim  [m]st  is:1dnt0
SFX C st tīsiet [m]st  is:2dnt0
SFX C st tīsit  [m]st  is:2dnt0
SFX C st tīšot  [m]st  is:0xnta


SFX b Y 180
SFX b t   šos     [^sz]t  is:1vna0
SFX b t   sies    [^sz]t  is:2xna0
SFX b t   simies  [^sz]t  is:1dna0
SFX b t   sieties [^sz]t  is:2dna0
SFX b t   sities  [^sz]t  is:2dna0
SFX b t   šoties  [^sz]t  is:0xnaa
SFX b t   īšos     [z]t  is:1vna0
SFX b t   īsies    [z]t  is:2xna0
SFX b t   īsimies  [z]t  is:1dna0
SFX b t   īsieties [z]t  is:2dna0
SFX b t   īsities  [z]t  is:2dna0
SFX b t   īšoties  [z]t  is:0xnaa
SFX b st  dīšos     [^aeiīnuūlr]st  is:1vna0
SFX b st  dīsies    [^aeiīnuūlr]st  is:2xna0
SFX b st  dīsimies  [^aeiīnuūlr]st  is:1dna0
SFX b st  dīsieties [^aeiīnuūlr]st  is:2dna0
SFX b st  dīsities  [^aeiīnuūlr]st  is:2dna0
SFX b st  dīšoties  [^aeiīnuūlr]st  is:0xnaa
SFX b st  tīšos     [n]st   is:1vna0
SFX b st  tīsies    [n]st   is:3xna0
SFX b st  tīsimies  [n]st   is:1dna0
SFX b st  tīsieties [n]st   is:2dna0
SFX b st  tīsities  [n]st   is:2dna0
SFX b st  tīšoties  [n]st   is:0xnaa
SFX b st  dīšos     [^p][r]ast  is:1vna0
SFX b st  dīsies    [^p][r]ast  is:2xna0
SFX b st  dīsimies  [^p][r]ast  is:1dna0
SFX b st  dīsieties [^p][r]ast  is:2dna0
SFX b st  dīsities  [^p][r]ast  is:2dna0
SFX b st  dīšoties  [^p][r]ast  is:0xnaa
SFX b st  tīšos     [p]rast   is:1vna0
SFX b st  tīsies    [p]rast   is:3xna0
SFX b st  tīsimies  [p]rast   is:1dna0
SFX b st  tīsieties [p]rast   is:2dna0
SFX b st  tīsities  [p]rast   is:2dna0
SFX b st  tīšoties  [p]rast   is:0xnaa
SFX b st  dīšos     [^a]lst  is:1vna0
SFX b st  dīsies    [^a]lst  is:3xna0
SFX b st  dīsimies  [^a]lst  is:1dna0
SFX b st  dīsieties [^a]lst  is:2dna0
SFX b st  dīsities  [^a]lst  is:2dna0
SFX b st  dīšoties  [^a]lst  is:0xnaa
SFX b st  tīšos     [a]lst    is:1vna0
SFX b st  tīsies    [a]lst    is:3xna0
SFX b st  tīsimies  [a]lst    is:1dna0
SFX b st  tīsieties [a]lst    is:2dna0
SFX b st  tīsities  [a]lst    is:2dna0
SFX b st  tīšoties  [a]lst    is:0xnaa
SFX b st  tīšos     [c]iest  is:1vna0
SFX b st  tīsies    [c]iest  is:3xna0
SFX b st  tīsimies  [c]iest  is:1dna0
SFX b st  tīsieties [c]iest  is:2dna0
SFX b st  tīsities  [c]iest  is:2dna0
SFX b st  tīšoties  [c]iest  is:0xnaa
SFX b st  tīšos     [lm]est   is:1vna0
SFX b st  tīsies    [lm]est   is:2xna0
SFX b st  tīsimies  [lm]est   is:1dna0
SFX b st  tīsieties [lm]est   is:2dna0
SFX b st  tīsities  [lm]est   is:2dna0
SFX b st  tīšoties  [lm]est   is:0xnaa
SFX b st  dīšos     [^c][^lm]est  is:1vna0
SFX b st  dīsies    [^c][^lm]est  is:2xna0
SFX b st  dīsimies  [^c][^lm]est  is:1dna0
SFX b st  dīsieties [^c][^lm]est  is:2dna0
SFX b st  dīsities  [^c][^lm]est  is:2dna0
SFX b st  dīšoties  [^c][^lm]est  is:0xnaa
SFX b st  tīšos     [^aģr]ist  is:1vna0
SFX b st  tīsies    [^aģr]ist  is:2xna0
SFX b st  tīsimies  [^aģr]ist  is:1dna0
SFX b st  tīsieties [^aģr]ist  is:2dna0
SFX b st  tīsities  [^aģr]ist  is:2dna0
SFX b st  tīšoties  [^aģr]ist  is:0xnaa
SFX b st  dīšos     [ģ]ist   is:1vna0
SFX b st  dīsies    [ģ]ist   is:2xna0
SFX b st  dīsimies  [ģ]ist   is:1dna0
SFX b st  dīsieties [ģ]ist   is:2dna0
SFX b st  dīsities  [ģ]ist   is:2dna0
SFX b st  dīšoties  [ģ]ist   is:0xnaa
SFX b st  dīšos     [^k]rist  is:1vna0
SFX b st  dīsies    [^k]rist  is:2xna0
SFX b st  dīsimies  [^k]rist  is:1dna0
SFX b st  dīsieties [^k]rist  is:2dna0
SFX b st  dīsities  [^k]rist  is:2dna0
SFX b st  dīšoties  [^k]rist  is:0xnaa
SFX b st  tīšos     [k]rist    is:1vna0
SFX b st  tīsies    [k]rist    is:2xna0
SFX b st  tīsimies  [k]rist    is:1dna0
SFX b st  tīsieties [k]rist    is:2dna0
SFX b st  tīsities  [k]rist    is:2dna0
SFX b st  tīšoties  [k]rist    is:0xnaa
SFX b st  tīšos     [^l]aist  is:1vna0
SFX b st  tīsies    [^l]aist  is:2xna0
SFX b st  tīsimies  [^l]aist  is:1dna0
SFX b st  tīsieties [^l]aist  is:2dna0
SFX b st  tīsities  [^l]aist  is:2dna0
SFX b st  tīšoties  [^l]aist  is:0xnaa
SFX b st  dīšos     [l]aist    is:1vna0
SFX b st  dīsies    [l]aist    is:2xna0
SFX b st  dīsimies  [l]aist    is:1dna0
SFX b st  dīsieties [l]aist    is:2dna0
SFX b st  dīsities  [l]aist    is:2dna0
SFX b st  dīšoties  [l]aist    is:0xnaa
SFX b st  dīšos     [^v]īst   is:1vna0
SFX b st  dīsies    [^v]īst   is:2xna0
SFX b st  dīsimies  [^v]īst   is:1dna0
SFX b st  dīsieties [^v]īst   is:2dna0
SFX b st  dīsities  [^v]īst   is:2dna0
SFX b st  dīšoties  [^v]īst   is:0xnaa
SFX b st  tīšos     [^s]vīst   is:1vna0
SFX b st  tīsies    [^s]vīst   is:2xna0
SFX b st  tīsimies  [^s]vīst   is:1dna0
SFX b st  tīsieties [^s]vīst   is:2dna0
SFX b st  tīsities  [^s]vīst   is:2dna0
SFX b st  tīšoties  [^s]vīst   is:0xnaa
SFX b st  dīšos     [s]vīst   is:1vna0
SFX b st  dīsies    [s]vīst   is:2xna0
SFX b st  dīsimies  [s]vīst   is:1dna0
SFX b st  dīsieties [s]vīst   is:2dna0
SFX b st  dīsities  [s]vīst   is:2dna0
SFX b st  dīšoties  [s]vīst   is:0xnaa
SFX b st  dīšos     [^ajsš]ust is:1vna0
SFX b st  dīsies    [^ajsš]ust is:2xna0
SFX b st  dīsimies  [^ajsš]ust is:1dna0
SFX b st  dīsieties [^ajsš]ust is:2dna0
SFX b st  dīsities  [^ajsš]ust is:2dna0
SFX b st  dīšoties  [^ajsš]ust is:0xnaa
SFX b st  tīšos     [jsš]ust  is:1vna0
SFX b st  tīsies    [jsš]ust  is:2xna0
SFX b st  tīsimies  [jsš]ust  is:1dna0
SFX b st  tīsieties [jsš]ust  is:2dna0
SFX b st  tīsities  [jsš]ust  is:2dna0
SFX b st  tīšoties  [jsš]ust  is:0xnaa
SFX b st  dīšos     [^j]aust   is:1vna0
SFX b st  dīsies    [^j]aust   is:2xna0
SFX b st  dīsimies  [^j]aust   is:1dna0
SFX b st  dīsieties [^j]aust   is:2dna0
SFX b st  dīsities  [^j]aust   is:2dna0
SFX b st  dīšoties  [^j]aust   is:0xnaa
SFX b st  tīšos      [j]aust  is:1vna0
SFX b st  tīsies     [j]aust  is:2xna0
SFX b st  tīsimies   [j]aust  is:1dna0
SFX b st  tīsieties  [j]aust  is:2dna0
SFX b st  tīsities   [j]aust  is:2dna0
SFX b st  tīšoties   [j]aust  is:0xnaa
SFX b st  dīšos     [^p]ūst  is:1vna0
SFX b st  dīsies    [^p]ūst  is:2xna0
SFX b st  dīsimies  [^p]ūst  is:1dna0
SFX b st  dīsieties [^p]ūst  is:2dna0
SFX b st  dīsities  [^p]ūst  is:2dna0
SFX b st  dīšoties  [^p]ūst  is:0xnaa
SFX b st  tīšos      [p]ūst   is:1vna0
SFX b st  tīsies     [p]ūst   is:2xna0
SFX b st  tīsimies   [p]ūst   is:1dna0
SFX b st  tīsieties  [p]ūst   is:2dna0
SFX b st  tīsities   [p]ūst   is:2dna0
SFX b st  tīšoties   [p]ūst   is:0xnaa
SFX b t  īšos     [^āiē]rst  is:1vna0
SFX b t  īsies    [^āiē]rst  is:2xna0
SFX b t  īsimies  [^āiē]rst  is:1dna0
SFX b t  īsieties [^āiē]rst  is:2dna0
SFX b t  īsities  [^āiē]rst  is:2dna0
SFX b t  īšoties  [^āiē]rst  is:0xnaa
SFX b st  tīšos      [āi]rst  is:1vna0
SFX b st  tīsies     [āi]rst  is:2xna0
SFX b st  tīsimies   [āi]rst  is:1dna0
SFX b st  tīsieties  [āi]rst  is:2dna0
SFX b st  tīsities   [āi]rst  is:2dna0
SFX b st  tīšoties   [āi]rst  is:0xnaa
SFX b st  dīšos      [^v]ērst  is:1vna0
SFX b st  dīsies     [^v]ērst  is:2xna0
SFX b st  dīsimies   [^v]ērst  is:1dna0
SFX b st  dīsieties  [^v]ērst  is:2dna0
SFX b st  dīsities   [^v]ērst  is:2dna0
SFX b st  dīšoties   [^v]ērst  is:0xnaa
SFX b st  tīšos      [v]ērst  is:1vna0
SFX b st  tīsies     [v]ērst  is:2xna0
SFX b st  tīsimies   [v]ērst  is:1dna0
SFX b st  tīsieties  [v]ērst  is:2dna0
SFX b st  tīsities   [v]ērst  is:2dna0
SFX b st  tīšoties   [v]ērst  is:0xnaa

SFX c Y 12
SFX c t īšos     [^m]st  is:1vna0
SFX c t īsies    [^m]st  is:2xna0
SFX c t īsimies  [^m]st  is:1dna0
SFX c t īsieties [^m]st  is:2dna0
SFX c t īsities  [^m]st  is:2dna0
SFX c t īšoties  [^m]st  is:0xnaa
SFX c st tīšos     [m]st  is:1vna0
SFX c st tīsies    [m]st  is:2xna0
SFX c st tīsimies  [m]st  is:1dna0
SFX c st tīsieties [m]st  is:2dna0
SFX c st tīsities  [m]st  is:2dna0
SFX c st tīšoties  [m]st  is:0xnaa
